Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2672YH (3) 91 je/ko H.F. 718 Section 1. Section 17A.4, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. Any rule filed pursuant to this section or section 3 17A.5 that necessitates additional annual expenditures of at 4 least one hundred thousand dollars or combined expenditures 5 of at least five hundred thousand dollars within five years 6 by all affected persons, including the agency itself, shall 7 be accompanied by a fiscal impact statement outlining the 8 expenditures. The agency shall promptly deliver a copy of file 9 the statement to with the legislative services agency along 10 with the rule filed with the administrative rules coordinator 11 and the administrative code editor pursuant to this section 12 or section 17A.5 . To the extent feasible, the legislative 13 services agency shall analyze the statement and provide a 14 summary of that analysis to the administrative rules review 15 committee. If the agency has made a good-faith effort to 16 comply with the requirements of this subsection , the rule shall 17 not be invalidated on the ground that the contents of the 18 statement are insufficient or inaccurate. 19 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 17A.25 Delay, rescission, and approval 20 of rules ââ fiscal impact. 21 1. a. If the fiscal impact statement prepared by an agency 22 pursuant to section 17A.4, subsection 4, for a rule adopted 23 pursuant to section 17A.5 indicates the rule will necessitate 24 additional annual expenditures of at least one million dollars, 25 or combined expenditures of at least five million dollars 26 within five years, by all affected persons, including the 27 agency itself, the effective date of the rule shall be delayed 28 until the adjournment of the next regular session of the 29 general assembly that convenes after the rule is published 30 in the Iowa administrative bulletin. The agency shall note 31 the delay in its filing submitted to the administrative 32 rules coordinator and administrative code editor pursuant to 33 section 17A.5, subsection 1. The administrative code editor 34 shall publish notice of the delay in the Iowa administrative 35 -1- LSB 2672YH (3) 91 je/ko 1/ 5 H.F. 718 bulletin. The agency shall not adopt such a rule pursuant to 1 section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , unless the rule was 2 also adopted pursuant to section 17A.4, subsection 3. 3 b. Upon the adjournment of the regular session of the 4 general assembly specified in paragraph âaâ , a rule delayed 5 pursuant to paragraph âaâ is rescinded and shall not become 6 effective. As soon as practicable after such rescission, 7 the administrative code editor shall publish notice of the 8 rescission in the Iowa administrative bulletin and, no sooner 9 than two weeks after such publication, remove the rule from the 10 Iowa administrative code. 11 c. During the period of a delay pursuant to paragraph âaâ , 12 the agency may do any of the following: 13 (1) Engage in further rulemaking that will amend or repeal 14 a rule subject to the delay. However, any rule that amends 15 or repeals a rule subject to a delay, and that will become 16 effective during the delay, shall be subject to that delay as 17 though it were included in the initially delayed rule. 18 (2) Submit a notice of rescission that rescinds the rule 19 to the administrative rules coordinator and the administrative 20 code editor for publication in the Iowa administrative 21 bulletin. Upon publication of the notice of rescission, if 22 the rule has not already become effective or been rescinded, 23 the rule is rescinded and shall not become effective. As 24 soon as practicable, but no sooner than two weeks after such 25 publication, the administrative code editor shall remove the 26 rule from the Iowa administrative code. 27 d. If the effective date of a rule adopted by an agency that 28 would otherwise be subject to a delay pursuant to subsection 1 29 may occur after the adjournment of the regular session of the 30 general assembly specified in paragraph âaâ , such rule shall be 31 deemed to be delayed pursuant to subsection 1 and subject to 32 this section. 33 e. This section shall not apply to a rule adopted pursuant 34 to section 17A.4, subsection 3. 35 -2- LSB 2672YH (3) 91 je/ko 2/ 5 H.F. 718 2. The general assembly may, by a joint resolution approved 1 by the governor, approve a rule delayed pursuant to subsection 2 1 prior to its rescission pursuant to subsection 1. Upon 3 approval of the joint resolution by the governor, the rule 4 shall not be rescinded and shall become effective upon the date 5 of approval of the joint resolution by the governor, or another 6 date specified in the joint resolution. This subsection shall 7 not be construed to prohibit the general assembly from enacting 8 other legislation relating to a rule delayed pursuant to 9 subsection 1, including but not limited to a joint resolution 10 to nullify the rule. 11 3. For purposes of this section, âadditional annual 12 expendituresâ includes expenditures by political subdivisions 13 or agencies, and entities which contract with political 14 subdivisions, to provide services as described in section 15 25B.6, subsection 1. âAdditional annual expendituresâ does not 16 include an expenditure of funds by the agency that adopted 17 a rule if the funds were appropriated to the agency for the 18 purpose of the agency program or other function implemented by 19 the rule. 20 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to rules adopted by 21 agencies pursuant to section 17A.5 on or after July 1, 2026. 22